District of Columbia statutes.
47-2851.03a

Existing licenses eliminated.

(a)

Repealed.

(b)

(1)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(A)

Educational and Cultural Institutions;

(B)

Institutions of Learning;

(C)

Medical and Dental Colleges;

(D)

Post-Secondary Institutions; and

(E)

Veterans Training.

(2)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall receive an Educational Services license endorsement.

(c)

(1)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(A)

Athletic Exhibition;

(B)

Billiard Parlor;

(C)

Bowling Alley;

(D)

Carnival (including street festivals);

(E)

Circus;

(F)

Mechanical Amusement;

(G)

Moving Picture Theater;

(H)

Public Hall;

(I)

Business Street Photographer;

(J)

Skating Rinks;

(K)

Special Events; and

(L)

Theater (live).

(2)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall receive an Entertainment license endorsement.

(d)

(1)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories, except that where special endorsements or permits are required for hazardous waste treatment or asbestos waste abatement, these special endorsements or permits shall be obtained separately:

(A)

Asbestos Abatement Business;

(B)

Bulk Fuel Metering;

(C)

Bulk Fuel Storage Plant;

(D)

Bulk Fuel Above Ground Tank;

(E)

Dry Cleaner;

(F)

Explosives;

(G)

Fireworks Sales;

(H)

Gasoline Dealer;

(I)

Hazardous Waste Management;

(J)

Kerosene;

(K)

Pesticide Applicator;

(L)

Pesticide Operator;

(M)

Pyroxylin;

(N)

Restricted Use Pesticide Dealer;

(O)

Solid Waste Collectors;

(P)

Solid Waste Handling Facilities;

(Q)

Solid Waste Vehicles;

(R)

Solvent Sales; and

(S)

Varsol Sales.

(2)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall receive an Environmental Materials license endorsement.

(e)

(1)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(A)

Check Sellers;

(B)

Consumer Credit Service Organization;

(C)

Fraternal Benefit Associations;

(D)

Insurance Companies;

(E)

Insurance Premium Finance Companies;

(F)

Insurance Rating Organizations;

(G)

Life and Fire Insurance Companies;

(H)

Marine Insurance;

(I)

Money Lender;

(J)

Mortgage Lenders and Brokers;

(K)

Reinsurance Intermediary;

(L)

Risk Retention Group; and

(M)

Sales/Finance Company.

(2)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall receive a Financial Services license endorsement.

(f)

(1)

(A)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(i)

Candy Manufacturing;

(ii)

Commercial Merchant Food;

(iii)

Ice Cream Manufacturing; and

(iv)

Marine Product.

(B)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall receive a Public Health: Food Establishment Retail license endorsement.

(2)

(A)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(i)

Bakery;

(ii)

Caterers;

(iii)

Delicatessen;

(iv)

Food Product;

(v)

Food Vending Machines;

(vi)

Grocery;

(vii)

Restaurant; and

(viii)

Vendor (A).

(B)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall receive a Public Health: Food Establishment Retail license endorsement.

(g)

(1)

(A)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(i)

Boarding House;

(ii)

Hotel;

(iii)

Inn and Motel; and

(iv)

Rooming House.

(B)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall receive a Housing: Transient license endorsement.

(2)

(A)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(i)

Apartment House; and

(ii)

Cooperative Association.

(B)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall receive a Housing: Residential License endorsement.

(h)

(1)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(A)

Ambulance;

(B)

Auctioneer;

(C)

Auctioning;

(D)

Elevators;

(E)

Hearing-aid dealer;

(F)

Horse Drawn Carriage Trade;

(G)

Pawnbrokers;

(H)

Pet shops;

(I)

Secondhand Dealers (A);

(J)

Secondhand Dealers (C);

(K)

Security Alarm Dealers; and

(L)

Taxicab.

(2)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall receive an Inspected Sales and Services license endorsement.

(i)

(1)

Mattress manufacturing license is eliminated as a separate license category.

(2)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishment listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall receive a Manufacturing license endorsement.

(j)

(1)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(A)

Auto Repossessor;

(B)

Auto Rental;

(C)

Auto Wash;

(D)

Consumer Goods (Auto Repair);

(E)

Driving School;

(F)

Motor Vehicle Dealer;

(G)

Motor Vehicle Sales; and

(H)

Tow Truck.

(2)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall receive a Motor Vehicle Sales, Service, and Repair license endorsement.

(k)

(1)

(A)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(i)

Ambulatory Surgical Treatment Center;

(ii)

Health Provider Plans;

(iii)

Home Health Agency;

(iv)

Hospital-Medical/surgical;

(v)

Hospital-ICU/Coronary;

(vi)

Hospital-OB/GYN;

(vii)

Hospital-Nursery;

(viii)

Hospital-Intermediate Neonatal and Neonatal Intensive Care;

(ix)

Hospital-Pediatrics;

(x)

Hospital-Alcoholism/Chemical Dependency;

(xi)

Hospital-Rehabilitation;

(xii)

Hospital-Psychiatric;

(xiii)

Maternity Center;

(xiv)

Non-hospital Outpatient Facility;

(xv)

Nursing Home;

(xvi)

Renal Dialysis Center; and

(xvii)

Substance Abuse Treatment Center.

(B)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall receive a Public Health: Health Care Facility license endorsement. For any Hospital-Psychiatric, both this endorsement and the master business license shall be issued by the Department of Mental Health.

(2)

(A)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(i)

Community Residence Facility; and

(ii)

Group Homes for Mentally Retarded People.

(B)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall receive a Public Health: Human Services Facility license endorsement.

(3)

(A)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(i)

Child Development Centers;

(ii)

Child Development Homes;

(iii)

Child-Placing Agencies; and

(iv)

Youth Residential Facilities.

(B)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall receive a Public Health: Child health and Welfare license endorsement. For Youth Residential Facilities that are Foster Homes or Group Homes, and for Child-Placing Agencies, both this endorsement and the master business license shall be issued by the Child and Family Services Agency.

(4)

(A)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(i)

Barber Shop;

(ii)

Beauty Shop;

(iii)

Health Spa;

(iv)

Massage Establishment; and

(v)

Swimming Pool.

(B)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall receive a Public Health: Public Accommodations license endorsement.

(5)

(A)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(i)

Drug Distributor;

(ii)

Drug Manufacturer;

(iii)

Patent Medicine; and

(iv)

Pharmacy.

(B)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall receive a Public Health: Pharmacy and Pharmaceuticals license endorsement.

(6)

(A)

The funeral services establishment license is eliminated as a separate license category.

(B)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishment listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall receive a Public Health: Funeral Establishments license endorsement.

(7)

(A)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(i)

Installer of Radioactive Equipment;

(ii)

Low Level Radioactive Waste Generator;

(iii)

Repairer of Radioactive Equipment; and

(iv)

Supplier of Radioactive Equipment.

(B)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall receive a Public Health: Radioactive Equipment license endorsement.

(8)

(A)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(i)

Clinical Laboratory; and

(ii)

Physician Office Laboratory.

(B)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall receive a Public Health: Laboratory license endorsement.

(l)

(1)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(A)

Dealers in Dangerous Weapons;

(B)

Firearms Dealer;

(C)

Private Detective Agencies; and

(D)

Retail Weapons Dealer.

(2)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall receive a Public Safety license endorsement.

(m)

(1)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(A)

Employment Agency;

(B)

Employer Paid Personnel Service; and

(C)

Employment Counseling.

(2)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the following establishments shall receive an Employment Services license endorsement.

(n)

(1)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(A)

Barber Chair;

(B)

Beauty Booth;

(C)

Bingo Suppliers;

(D)

Cigarette Sales Retail;

(E)

Cigarette Sales Wholesale;

(F)

Mattress Sales;

(G)

Second Hand Dealers (B);

(H)

Solicitor;

(I)

Vendor (B); and

(J)

Vendor (D).

(2)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall receive a General Sales license endorsement.

(o)

(1)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(A)

Consumer Goods (Electronic Repair);

(B)

Dry Cleaner;

(C)

Home Improvement;

(D)

Moving of Household Goods;

(E)

Outdoor Signs;

(F)

Parking Establishment;

(G)

Power Laundry;

(H)

Tour Guide (A); and

(I)

Tour Guide (B).

(2)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for the establishments listed in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall receive a General Services and Repair license endorsement.

(p)

(1)

The following licenses are eliminated as separate license categories:

(A)

Charitable Solicitation; and

(B)

Cooperative Associations (Non-residential).

(2)

Businesses meeting the criteria established by law or regulation for these establishments shall receive a General Business license endorsement.

(q)

The following licenses are hereby eliminated:

(1)

Bottling Establishment;

(2)

Close Out Sale;

(3)

Coal Dealer;

(4)

Elevator Operator;

(5)

Job Listing;

(6)

Food Handlers;

(7)

Cigarette Vending Machine;

(8)

Laundry (Hand/Ironing);

(9)

Livery;

(10)

Medium;

(11)

Moving Pictures, Film Storage;

(12)

Public Scale;

(13)

Shooting Gallery;

(14)

Slot Weight Machine;

(15)

Street Photographer;

(16)

Rental Housing Locator;

(17)

Abattoirs or Slaughterhouse; and

(18)

Money Lender (B).

History

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2002(f), 46 DCR 3142
Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-277, § 3(e), 48 DCR 2043
Dec. 18, 2001, D.C. Law 14-56, § 116(l), 48 DCR 7674
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 12(f), 51 DCR 881
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 302(c), 51 DCR 6525
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 85(b), 52 DCR 2638

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2851.3a.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-277, in subsec. (k)(3)(B), added the second sentence.
D.C. Law 14-56, in subsec., (k)(1)(B), added the last sentence.
D.C. Law 15-105, in subsec. (f), validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 15-187 repealed subsec. (a).
D.C. Law 15-354, in subsec. (f), validated a previously made technical correction.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 16(l) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-51, October 30, 2001, law notification 49 DCR 352).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 16(l) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-55, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4390).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 16(l) of Department of Mental Health Establishment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-101, July 23, 2001, 48 DCR 7123).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 116(l) of Mental Health Service Delivery Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-144, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 9947).

Short Title

Short title of title II of Law 12-261: Section 2001 of D.C. Law 12-261 provided that title II of the act may be cited as the Business Regulatory Reform Act of 1998.